Hawaii, session 2026, HB1337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that seed banks are one of the most prevalent and practical approaches to the conservation of resources for habitat restoration and are important in preserving plant biodiversity.  Endemic seed banking has become increasingly important as over one-half of Hawaii's native flora are at risk of extirpation or extinction due to human impacts.  The legislature therefore finds that this Act is an issue of statewide concern. The purpose of this Act is to require the university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resilience to establish an endemic plant seed bank pilot program to preserve and promote the planting of plant species that are endemic to Hawaii. SECTION 2.  (a) The university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resilience shall establish an endemic plant seed bank pilot program. (b)  The pilot program shall focus on the development of a seed bank to preserve and promote the planting of plant species that are endemic to Hawaii. (c)  The university of Hawaii at Manoa college of tropical agriculture and human resilience shall submit a report on its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. (d)  The pilot program shall end on June 30, 2027. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.